Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.023

Rule-making authority.

For rules adopted after July 23, 1995, the director of the department of licensing may not rely solely on a section of law stating a statute's intent or purpose, on the enabling provisions of the statute establishing the agency, or on any combination of such provisions, for statutory authority to adopt any rule, except rules defining or clarifying terms in, or procedures necessary to the implementation of, a statute.

[ 1995 c 403 s 107.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—Intent—1995 c 403: See note following RCW 34.05.328.